Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.090

Chapter not affected by other acts.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, or provisions of law limiting the authority granted in this chapter, the legislative authority of any county shall have the authority to manage and exchange tax title lands heretofore or hereafter acquired in the manner and on the terms and conditions set forth in this chapter.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 150 s 3.]